Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 3. GUARDIANSHIP AND RELATED PROCEDURES

SUBTITLE C. PROCEDURAL MATTERS

CHAPTER 1051. NOTICES AND PROCESS IN GUARDIANSHIP PROCEEDINGS IN GENERAL

SUBCHAPTER A. ISSUANCE AND FORM OF NOTICE OR PROCESS

Sec. 1051.001. ISSUANCE OF NOTICE OR PROCESS IN GENERAL. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person is not required to be cited or otherwise given notice in a guardianship proceeding except in a situation in which this title expressly provides for citation or the giving of notice.

(b) If this title does not expressly provide for citation or the issuance or return of notice in a guardianship proceeding, the court may require that notice be given. A court that requires that notice be given shall prescribe the form and manner of service of the notice and the return of service.

(c) Unless a court order is required by this title, the county clerk without a court order shall issue:

(1) necessary citations, writs, and other process in a guardianship proceeding; and

(2) all notices not required to be issued by a guardian.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.016, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.002. DIRECTION OF WRIT OR OTHER PROCESS. (a) A writ or other process other than a citation or notice must be directed "To any sheriff or constable within the State of Texas."

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), a writ or other process other than a citation or notice may not be held defective because the process is directed to the sheriff or a constable of a named county if the process is properly served within that county by an officer authorized to serve the process.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.003. CONTENTS OF CITATION OR NOTICE. (a) A citation or notice must:

(1) be directed to the person to be cited or notified;

(2) be dated;

(3) state the style and number of the proceeding;

(4) state the court in which the proceeding is pending;

(5) describe generally the nature of the proceeding or matter to which the citation or notice relates;

(6) direct the person being cited or notified to appear by filing a written contest or answer or to perform another required action; and

(7) state when and where the appearance or performance described by Subdivision (6) is required.

(b) A citation or notice issued by the county clerk must be styled "The State of Texas" and be signed by the clerk under the court's seal.

(c) A notice required to be given by a guardian must be in writing and be signed by the guardian in the guardian's official capacity.

(d) A citation or notice is not required to contain a precept directed to an officer, but may not be held defective because the citation or notice contains a precept directed to an officer authorized to serve the citation or notice.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 521 (S.B. 626), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 576 (S.B. 615), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. METHODS OF SERVING CITATION OR NOTICE; PERSONS TO BE SERVED

Sec. 1051.051. PERSONAL SERVICE. (a) Except as otherwise provided by Subsection (b), if personal service of citation or notice is required, the citation or notice must be served on the attorney of record for the person to be cited or notified. Notwithstanding the requirement of personal service, service may be made on that attorney by any method specified by Section 1051.055 for service on an attorney of record.

(b) If the person to be cited or notified does not have an attorney of record in the proceeding, or if an attempt to serve the person's attorney is unsuccessful:

(1) the sheriff or constable shall serve the citation or notice by delivering a copy of the citation or notice to the person to be cited or notified, in person, if the person to whom the citation or notice is directed is in this state; or

(2) a disinterested person competent to make an oath that the citation or notice was served may serve the citation or notice, if the person to be cited or notified is absent from or is not a resident of this state.

(c) The return day of the citation or notice served under Subsection (b) must be at least 10 days after the date of service, excluding the date of service.

(d) If the citation or notice attempted to be served as provided by Subsection (b) is returned with the notation that the person sought to be served, whether inside or outside this state, cannot be found, the county clerk shall issue a new citation or notice. Service of the new citation or notice must be made by publication.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.052. SERVICE BY MAIL OR QUALIFIED DELIVERY METHOD. (a) The county clerk, or the guardian if required by statute or court order, shall serve a citation or notice required or permitted to be served by regular mail by mailing the original citation or notice to the person to be cited or notified.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the county clerk shall issue a citation or notice required or permitted to be served by a qualified delivery method and shall serve the citation or notice by sending the original citation or notice by a qualified delivery method.

(c) A guardian shall issue a notice required to be given by the guardian by a qualified delivery method and shall serve the notice by sending the original notice by a qualified delivery method.

(d) The county clerk or guardian, as applicable, shall send a citation or notice under Subsection (b) or (c) with an instruction to deliver the citation or notice to the addressee only and with return receipt or other proof of delivery requiring recipient signature requested. The clerk or guardian, as applicable, shall address the envelope containing the citation or notice to:

(1) the attorney of record in the proceeding for the person to be cited or notified; or

(2) the person to be cited or notified, if the citation or notice to the attorney is returned undelivered or the person to be cited or notified has no attorney of record in the proceeding.

(e) Service by a qualified delivery method must be made at least 20 days before the return day of the citation or notice, excluding the date of service. The date of service is the date of mailing, the date of deposit with the private delivery service, or the date of delivery by courier, as applicable.

(f) A copy of a citation or notice served under Subsection (a), (b), or (c) and a certificate of the person serving the citation or notice showing that the citation or notice was sent and the date of the mailing, the date of deposit with a private delivery service, or the date of delivery by courier, as applicable, shall be filed and recorded. A returned receipt or other proof of delivery receipt for a citation or notice served under Subsection (b) or (c) shall be attached to the certificate.

(g) If a citation or notice served by mail is returned undelivered, a new citation or notice shall be issued. Service of the new citation or notice must be made by posting.

Text of subsection as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 4

(h) The applicant or movant in a guardianship proceeding shall pay the cost of delivery of a citation or notice under this section, to be taxed as costs in the proceeding.

Text of subsection as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 4

(h) The applicant or movant in a guardianship proceeding shall pay the cost of delivery of a citation or notice under this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1051.053. SERVICE BY POSTING. (a) The county clerk shall deliver the original and a copy of a citation or notice required to be posted to the sheriff or a constable of the county in which the proceeding is pending. The sheriff or constable shall post the copy at the door of the county courthouse or the location in or near the courthouse where public notices are customarily posted.

(b) Citation or notice under this section must be posted for at least 10 days before the return day of the citation or notice, excluding the date of posting, except as provided by Section 1051.152(b). The date of service of citation or notice by posting is the date of posting.

(c) A sheriff or constable who posts a copy of a citation or notice under this section shall return the original citation or notice to the county clerk and state the date and location of the posting in a written return of the copy of the citation or notice.

(d) The method of service prescribed by this section applies when a guardian is required or permitted to post a notice. The notice must be:

(1) issued in the name of the guardian;

(2) addressed and delivered to, and posted and returned by, the appropriate officer; and

(3) filed with the county clerk.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.054. SERVICE BY PUBLICATION.

(a) Except as provided by Section 17.032, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, citation or notice to a person to be served by publication shall be published one time on the public information Internet website maintained as required by Section 72.034, Government Code, and in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proceeding is pending. The publication must be made at least 10 days before the return day of the citation or notice, excluding the date of publication.

(b) The date of service of citation or notice by publication is the earlier of:

(1) the date the citation or notice is published on the public information Internet website under Subsection (a); or

(2) the date of publication printed on the newspaper in which the citation or notice is published.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 15.02(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 10.07, eff. June 1, 2020.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 15.02(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1051.055. SERVICE ON PARTY'S ATTORNEY OF RECORD. (a) If a party is represented by an attorney of record in a guardianship proceeding, including a proposed ward who has been personally served with notice of the proceeding and is represented by an attorney ad litem, a citation or notice required to be served on the party shall be served instead on that attorney.

(b) A notice served on an attorney under this section may be served by delivery to the attorney in person or by a qualified delivery method.

(c) A notice or citation may be served on an attorney under this section by:

(1) another party to the proceeding;

(2) the attorney of record for another party to the proceeding;

(3) an appropriate sheriff or constable; or

(4) another person competent to testify.

(d) Each of the following is prima facie evidence of the fact that service has been made under this section:

(1) the written statement of an attorney of record showing service;

(2) the return of the officer showing service; and

(3) the affidavit of a person showing service.

(e) Except as provided by Section 1051.105, an attorney ad litem may not waive personal service of citation.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1051.056. SERVICE ON GUARDIAN OR RECEIVER. Unless this title expressly provides for another method of service, the county clerk who issues a citation or notice required to be served on a guardian or receiver shall serve the citation or notice by sending the original citation or notice by a qualified delivery method to:

(1) the guardian's or receiver's attorney of record; or

(2) the guardian or receiver, if the guardian or receiver does not have an attorney of record.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. NOTICE AND CITATION REQUIRED FOR APPLICATION FOR GUARDIANSHIP

Sec. 1051.101. NOTICE REQUIRED FOR APPLICATION FOR GUARDIANSHIP; CITATION OF APPLICANT NOT REQUIRED. (a) On the filing of an application for guardianship, notice shall be issued and served as provided by this subchapter.

(b) It is not necessary to serve a citation on a person who files an application for the creation of a guardianship under this title or for that person to waive the issuance and personal service of citation under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.102. ISSUANCE OF CITATION FOR APPLICATION FOR GUARDIANSHIP. (a) On the filing of an application for guardianship, the court clerk shall issue a citation stating:

(1) that the application was filed;

(2) the name of the proposed ward;

(3) the name of the applicant; and

(4) the name of the person to be appointed guardian as provided in the application, if that person is not the applicant.

(b) The citation must cite all persons interested in the welfare of the proposed ward to appear at the time and place stated in the notice if the persons wish to contest the application.

(c) The citation shall be posted.

(d) The citation must contain a clear and conspicuous statement informing those interested persons of the right provided under Section 1051.252 to be notified of any or all motions, applications, or pleadings relating to the application for the guardianship or any subsequent guardianship proceeding involving the ward after the guardianship is created, if any.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.017, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.103. SERVICE OF CITATION FOR APPLICATION FOR GUARDIANSHIP. (a) The sheriff or other officer shall personally serve citation to appear and answer an application for guardianship on:

(1) a proposed ward who is 12 years of age or older;

(2) the proposed ward's parents, if the whereabouts of the parents are known or can be reasonably ascertained;

(3) any court-appointed conservator or person having control of the care and welfare of the proposed ward;

(4) the proposed ward's spouse, if the whereabouts of the spouse are known or can be reasonably ascertained; and

(5) the person named in the application to be appointed guardian, if that person is not the applicant.

(b) A citation served as provided by Subsection (a) must contain the statement regarding the right under Section 1051.252 that is required in the citation issued under Section 1051.102.

(c) A citation served as provided by Subsection (a) to a relative of the proposed ward described by Subsection (a)(2) or (4) must contain a statement notifying the relative that, if a guardianship is created for the proposed ward, the relative must elect in writing in order to receive notice about the ward under Section 1151.056.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.018, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (S.B. 1709), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 1051.104. NOTICE BY APPLICANT FOR GUARDIANSHIP. (a) The person filing an application for guardianship shall send a copy of the application and a notice containing the information required in the citation issued under Section 1051.102 by a qualified delivery method to the following persons, if their whereabouts are known or can be reasonably ascertained:

(1) each adult child of the proposed ward;

(2) each adult sibling of the proposed ward;

(3) the administrator of a nursing home facility or similar facility in which the proposed ward resides;

(4) the operator of a residential facility in which the proposed ward resides;

(5) a person whom the applicant knows to hold a power of attorney signed by the proposed ward;

(6) a person designated to serve as guardian of the proposed ward by a written declaration under Subchapter E, Chapter 1104, if the applicant knows of the existence of the declaration;

(7) a person designated to serve as guardian of the proposed ward in the probated will of the last surviving parent of the proposed ward;

(8) a person designated to serve as guardian of the proposed ward by a written declaration of the proposed ward's last surviving parent, if the declarant is deceased and the applicant knows of the existence of the declaration; and

(9) each adult named in the application as an "other living relative" of the proposed ward within the third degree by consanguinity, as required by Section 1101.001(b)(11) or (13), if the proposed ward's spouse and each of the proposed ward's parents, adult siblings, and adult children are deceased or there is no spouse, parent, adult sibling, or adult child.

(b) The applicant shall file with the court:

(1) a copy of any notice required by Subsection (a) and the return receipts or other proofs of delivery of the notice; and

(2) an affidavit sworn to by the applicant or the applicant's attorney stating:

(A) that the notice was sent as required by Subsection (a); and

(B) the name of each person to whom the notice was sent, if the person's name is not shown on the return receipt or other proof of delivery.

(c) Failure of the applicant to comply with Subsections (a)(2)-(9) does not affect the validity of a guardianship created under this title.

(d) Notice required by Subsection (a) to a relative of the proposed ward described by Subsection (a)(1) or (2) must contain a statement notifying the relative that, if a guardianship is created for the proposed ward, the relative must elect in writing in order to receive notice about the ward under Section 1151.056.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.019, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1031 (H.B. 1438), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (S.B. 1709), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1051.105. WAIVER OF NOTICE OF APPLICATION FOR GUARDIANSHIP. A person other than the proposed ward who is entitled to receive notice or personal service of citation under Sections 1051.103 and 1051.104(a) may, by writing filed with the clerk, waive the receipt of notice or the issuance and personal service of citation either in person or through an attorney ad litem.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.106. ACTION BY COURT ON APPLICATION FOR GUARDIANSHIP. The court may not act on an application for the creation of a guardianship until the applicant has complied with Section 1051.104(b) and not earlier than the Monday following the expiration of the 10-day period beginning on the date service of notice and citation has been made as provided by Sections 1051.102, 1051.103, and 1051.104(a)(1).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER D. RETURN AND PROOF OF SERVICE OF CITATION OR NOTICE

Sec. 1051.151. REQUIREMENTS FOR RETURN ON CITATION OR NOTICE SERVED BY PERSONAL SERVICE. The return of the person serving a citation or notice under Section 1051.051 must:

(1) be endorsed on or attached to the citation or notice;

(2) state the date and place of service;

(3) certify that a copy of the citation or notice was delivered to the person directed to be served;

(4) be subscribed and sworn to before, and under the hand and official seal of, an officer authorized by the laws of this state to take an affidavit; and

(5) be returned to the county clerk who issued the citation or notice.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.152. VALIDITY OF SERVICE AND RETURN ON CITATION OR NOTICE SERVED BY POSTING. (a) A citation or notice in a guardianship proceeding that is required to be served by posting and is issued in conformity with this title, and the service of and return of the citation or notice, is valid if:

(1) a sheriff or constable posts a copy of the citation or notice at the location or locations prescribed by this title; and

(2) the posting occurs on a day preceding the return day of service specified in the citation or notice that provides sufficient time for the period the citation or notice must be posted to expire before the specified return day.

(b) The fact that the sheriff or constable, as applicable, makes the return of service on the citation or notice described by Subsection (a) and returns the citation or notice on which the return has been made to the court before the expiration of the period the citation or notice must be posted does not affect the validity of the citation or notice or the service or return of service. This subsection applies even if the sheriff or constable makes the return of service and returns the citation or notice to the court on the same day the citation or notice is issued.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.020, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.153. PROOF OF SERVICE. (a) Proof of service in each case requiring citation or notice must be filed before a hearing.

(b) Proof of service consists of:

(1) if the service is made by a sheriff or constable, the return of service;

(2) if the service is made by a private person, the person's affidavit;

(3) if the service is made by mail or by a qualified delivery method:

(A) the certificate of the county clerk making the service, or the affidavit of the guardian or other person making the service that states that the citation or notice was mailed or sent by a qualified delivery method and the date of the mailing, the date of deposit with the private delivery service, or the date of delivery by courier, as applicable; and

(B) the return receipt or other proof of delivery receipt attached to the certificate or affidavit, as applicable, if the service was made by a qualified delivery method; and

(4) if the service is made by publication:

(A) a statement that:

(i) is made by the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System or an employee of the office;

(ii) contains or to which is attached a copy of the published citation or notice; and

(iii) states the date of publication on the public information Internet website maintained as required by Section 72.034, Government Code; and

(B) an affidavit that:

(i) is made by the publisher of the newspaper in which the citation or notice was published or an employee of the publisher;

(ii) contains or to which is attached a copy of the published citation or notice; and

(iii) states the date of publication printed on the newspaper in which the citation or notice was published.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 10.08, eff. June 1, 2020.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 9.03, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1051.154. RETURN TO COURT. A citation or notice issued by a county clerk must be returned to the court from which the citation or notice was issued on the first Monday after the service is perfected.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER E. ALTERNATIVE MANNER OF ISSUANCE, SERVICE, AND RETURN

Sec. 1051.201. COURT-ORDERED ISSUANCE, SERVICE, AND RETURN UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. (a) A citation or notice required by this title shall be issued, served, and returned in the manner specified by written order of the court in accordance with this title and the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure if:

(1) an interested person requests that action;

(2) a specific method is not provided by this title for giving the citation or notice;

(3) a specific method is not provided by this title for the service and return of citation or notice; or

(4) a provision with respect to a matter relating to citation or notice is inadequate.

(b) Citation or notice issued, served, and returned in the manner specified by a court order as provided by Subsection (a) has the same effect as if the manner of service and return had been specified by this title.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER F. ADDITIONAL NOTICE PROVISIONS

Sec. 1051.251. WAIVER OF NOTICE OF HEARING. (a) A competent person who is interested in a hearing in a guardianship proceeding may waive notice of the hearing in writing either in person or through an attorney.

(b) A consul or other representative of a foreign government whose appearance has been entered as provided by law on behalf of a person residing in a foreign country may waive notice on the person's behalf.

(c) A person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court in a hearing is considered to have waived notice of the hearing.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.252. REQUEST FOR NOTICE OF FILING OF PLEADING. (a) At any time after an application is filed to commence a guardianship proceeding, a person interested in the estate or welfare of a ward or incapacitated person may file with the county clerk a written request to be notified of all, or any specified, motions, applications, or pleadings filed with respect to the proceeding by any person or by a person specifically designated in the request. A person filing a request under this section is responsible for payment of the fees and other costs of providing the requested documents, and the clerk may require a deposit to cover the estimated costs of providing the notice. The clerk shall send to the requestor by regular mail a copy of any requested document.

(b) A county clerk's failure to comply with a request under this section does not invalidate a proceeding.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1051.253. SERVICE OF NOTICE OF INTENTION TO TAKE DEPOSITIONS IN CERTAIN PROCEEDINGS. (a) In a guardianship proceeding in which there is no opposing party or attorney of record on whom to serve notice and copies of interrogatories, service may be made by posting notice of the intention to take depositions for a period of 10 days as provided by Section 1051.053 governing a posting of notice.

(b) When notice by posting under Subsection (a) is filed with the clerk, a copy of the interrogatories must also be filed.

(c) At the expiration of the 10-day period prescribed by Subsection (a):

(1) the depositions for which the notice was posted may be taken; and

(2) the judge may file cross-interrogatories if no person appears.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.021, eff. January 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 982 (H.B. 2080), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.